Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-1302, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 11-1302. A. The Department of Transportation, Oklahoma


Turnpike Authority, and any county or city in this state are hereby


authorized to close any highway or section thereof, within their


respective jurisdiction, to traffic while the highway is flooded or


under repair, maintenance, or construction and, in exercising the


authority, shall erect or cause to be erected traffic-control


devices and barricades to warn and notify the public that the


highway has been closed to traffic.



Req. No. 2432 Page 1


B. When any highway has been closed to traffic under the


provisions of subsection A of this section and traffic-control


devices or barricades have been erected, it shall be unlawful for


any person to drive any vehicle through, under, over, or around the


traffic-control devices or barricades, or otherwise to enter the


closed area. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to


persons while engaged in the construction, maintenance, and repair


of the highway or to persons entering therein for the protection of


lives or property; provided, that persons having their places of


residence or places of business within the closed area may travel,


when possible to do so, through the area at their own risk.


C. Whenever construction, repair, and maintenance of any


highway is being performed under traffic, the Oklahoma Turnpike


Authority, Department of Transportation, county, or city having


jurisdiction over the highway shall erect, or cause to be erected,


traffic-control devices to warn and guide the public. Each person


using the highway shall obey all signs, signals, markings, flagmen


flagpersons, or other traffic-control devices which are placed to


regulate, control, and guide traffic through the construction or


maintenance area. As used in this subsection, “construction or


maintenance area” means any area upon or around any highway that is


visibly marked as an area where construction, repair, and


maintenance is temporarily occurring. The construction or


maintenance area also includes the lanes of highway leading up to

Req. No. 2432 Page 2


the area upon which an activity described in this section is being


performed, beginning at the point where properly posted traffic-


control devices start to warn and guide the public into and through


the construction or maintenance including, but not limited to,


instructions to merge from one lane into another lane, to reduce


speed, or to follow directions of flagmen flagpersons.


D. The “Merge Now” traffic-control device that is used to warn


and guide the public using the highway to merge shall be located in


advance of the highway construction or maintenance area in


accordance with the standards set forth in the most current edition


of the Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic


Control Devices. Whenever any traffic-control device requires


traffic to merge due to the closure of a section or lane of highway,


the merge shall be completed:


1. As soon as practicable after passing the traffic-control


device; and


2. Without passing any other traffic proceeding in the same


direction.


E. No person shall remove, change, modify, deface, or alter any


traffic-control device or barricade which has been erected on any


highway under the provisions of this section.


F. Nothing in this section shall relieve the state or any of


its subdivisions or their contractors, agents, servants, or



Req. No. 2432 Page 3


employees from liability for failure to perform any of the duties


imposed herein.


G. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, any


person who violates any provision of this section shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not


less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to


exceed thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and


shall be liable for any damage to property, or injury to or death to


persons caused by the violations. In addition, the court may order


restitution in an amount equal to the actual costs of the emergency


response and repair or replacement of any damaged or lost emergency


equipment.


H. 1. When any section of a highway, turnpike, county road, or


city street has been closed to traffic due to flooding that is


ongoing and traffic-control devices or barricades have been erected


by law enforcement or other government officials with authority over


traffic control, it shall be unlawful for any person to tear down,


damage, or remove any traffic-control devices or barricades or drive


any vehicle through, under, over, or around the traffic-control


devices or barricades, or otherwise to enter the closed area. Any


person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not


less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand

Req. No. 2432 Page 4


Dollars ($1,000.00). The person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)


nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and


imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year if


the operator of the motor vehicle was transporting a person eighteen


(18) years of age or younger at the time of the violation.


2. Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph 1 of


this subsection that results in the death of:


a. a person eighteen (18) years of age or younger shall,


upon conviction, be guilty of manslaughter in the


first degree, a Class A2 felony, punishable as


provided for in Section 715 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


b. a person older than eighteen (18) years of age shall,


upon conviction, be guilty of manslaughter in the


second degree, a Class B5 felony, punishable as


provided for in Section 722 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


3. Persons convicted pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be ordered to pay restitution in an amount equal to


the actual costs of the emergency response and repair or replacement


of any damaged or lost emergency equipment. In addition, the person


shall be liable for any damage to property or injury or death to


persons caused by the violation.

Req. No. 2432 Page 5


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2432 CN 1/8/2026 9:57:15 AM











































Req. No. 2432 Page 6